Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-106
Commission; members; term; removal; not to hold other office.

The Governor shall appoint three members of the commission, one of whom he shall designate as chairman. One member shall be appointed every two years and shall hold office for a period of six years. Any appointee may be removed by the Governor, after an opportunity to be heard, for malfeasance, misfeasance or neglect in office. No person shall be appointed to the commission, or continue to hold that office after appointment, while holding any other office or position under the laws of this state, any other state, or of the United States.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 7, p. 379;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-307;

R.S.1943, § 53-106.

Term of office of member of Liquor Control Commission is six years. State ex rel. Meyer v. Sorrell, 174 Neb. 340, 117 N.W.2d 872 (1962).

Authority to remove member of Liquor Control Commission is declaratory of power granted by the Constitution. State ex rel. Beck v. Young, 154 Neb. 588, 48 N.W.2d 677 (1951).

Member of Liquor Control Commission can only be removed by the Governor for cause, after an opportunity to be heard, and for the reasons set forth in this section. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).